Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.005

Director—Appointment—Salary.

The director of licensing shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall receive a salary in an amount fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.

[ 1999 c 240 s 3.]